Colorado, session 2026A, HB1035.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-5-126, add (2)(cc)
as follows:
2-5-126. Annual enactment of Colorado Revised Statutes -
validation - effective date.
(2) The annual statutes, copies of which shall be delivered to each
member of the general assembly, together with a listing of the revisor's
changes, constitute the official report of the committee on legal services and
are hereby enacted in accordance with this section as follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(cc) Colorado Revised Statutes 2025. COLORADO REVISED
STATUTES 2025, WHICH CONSISTS OF ALL OF THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF
COLORADO OF A GENERAL AND PERMANENT NATURE ORIGINALLY ENACTED
IN "COLORADO REVISED STATUTES 1973", INCLUDING SUBSEQUENT
ENACTMENTS MADE PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-5-125, AND ALL OF THE LAWS
OF THE STATE OF COLORADO OF A GENERAL AND PERMANENT NATURE
ENACTED AT THE FIRST REGULAR SESSION OF THE SEVENTY-FIFTH GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE FIRST EXTRAORDINARY SESSION OF THE SEVENTY-FIFTH
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND AS APPROVED BY THE VOTERS AT THE STATEWIDE
ELECTION ON NOVEMBER 4, 2025. THE EFFECTIVE DATE FOR COLORADO
REVISED STATUTES 2025 IS FIXED AS THE FIRST DAY THAT IS NOT A
SATURDAY, SUNDAY, OR LEGAL HOLIDAY FOLLOWING THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THIS SUBSECTION (2)(cc).
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1035

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1035